Washington statutes.
RCW 41.48.060

OASI contribution account.

(1) There is hereby established a special account in the state treasury to be known as the OASI contribution account. Such account shall consist of and there shall be deposited in such account: (a) All contributions and penalties collected under RCW 41.48.040 and 41.48.050; (b) all moneys appropriated thereto under this chapter; (c) any property or securities belonging to the account; and (d) all sums recovered upon the bond of the custodian or otherwise for losses sustained by the account and all other moneys received for the account from any other source. All moneys in the account shall be mingled and undivided. Subject to the provisions of this chapter, the governor is vested with full power, authority and jurisdiction over the account, including all moneys and property or securities belonging thereto, and may perform any and all acts whether or not specifically designated, which are necessary to the administration thereof and are consistent with the provisions of this chapter. During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, moneys in the OASI contribution account may also be transferred into the OASI revolving fund.

(2) The OASI contribution account shall be established and held separate and apart from any other funds of the state and shall be used and administered exclusively for the purpose of this chapter. Withdrawals from such account shall be made for, and solely for (a) payment of amounts required to be paid to the secretary of the treasury pursuant to an agreement entered into under RCW 41.48.030; (b) payment of refunds provided for in RCW 41.48.040(3); and (c) refunds of overpayments, not otherwise adjustable, made by a political subdivision or instrumentality.

(3) From the OASI contribution account the custodian of the fund [account] shall pay to the secretary of the treasury such amounts and at such time or times as may be directed by the governor in accordance with any agreement entered into under RCW 41.48.030 and the social security act.

(4) The treasurer of the state shall be ex officio treasurer and custodian of the OASI contribution account and shall administer such account in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and the directions of the governor and shall pay all warrants drawn upon it in accordance with the provisions of this section and with the regulations as the governor may prescribe pursuant thereto.

[ 2009 c 564 s 923; 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 112; 1973 c 126 s 14; 1967 c 213 s 1; 1951 c 184 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 564: See note following RCW 2.68.020.

Effective dates—Severability—1991 sp.s. c 13: See notes following RCW 18.08.240.